pl: Typ tarczy strzeleckiej: Zwierzę 3D; Cel workowy; Rzutek; Drzewo pojedynkowe; Wybuchowy/binarny; Piankowy; Gong; Tarcza do przystrzeliwania z siatką; IDPA/IPSC; Cel przewracany; Papierowy; Papierowy z punktem centralnym; Stojak z płytkami; Polimerowy samonaprawiający się; Reaktywny z zakładnikiem; Sylwetka; Cel obrotowy; Stalowy; Naklejka/rozpryskowy; Inne
fi: Ampumataulun tyyppi: 3D-eläin; Pussimaali; Kiekko; Kaksintaistelupuu; Räjähtävä/binäärinen; Vaahtomuovi; Gongi; Kohdistusruudukko; IDPA/IPSC; Kaatuva; Paperi; Napakymppi (paperi); Levyteline; Itsekorjautuva polymeeri; Reaktiivinen panttivanki; Siluetti; Pyörivä maali; Teräs; Tarra/roiske; Muu
nb: Type blink til skyting: 3D-dyr; Poseblink; Leirdue; Duelltre; Eksploderende/binær; Skum; Gong; Rutenett-innskyting; IDPA/IPSC; Vippeblink; Papir; Papirblink; Målstativ; Selvhelbredende polymer; Reaktiv gisselblink; Silhuett; Snurreblink; Stål; Klistremerke/splatter; Annet
lt-LT: Šaudymo taikinio tipas: 3D gyvūnas; Maišinis taikinys; Molinis balandis; Dvikovos medis; Sprogstantis / dvikomponentis; Putplasčio; Gongas; Tinklelis prišaudymui; IDPA / IPSC; Nuverčiamas; Popierinis; Popierinis taikinys su centru; Plokštelių stovas; Polimerinis savaime užsitraukiantis; Reaktyvus (įkaitų scenarijaus); Siluetas; Sukamasis; Plieninis; Lipdukas / spalvą keičiantis; Kita
nl: Type schietdoel: 3D-dier; Schietzak-doel; Kleiduif; Dueling tree; Explosief/binair; Schuim; Gong; Grid inschietdoel; IDPA/IPSC; Omvaldoel; Papier; Papieren roos; Platenrek; Zelfherstellend polymeer; Reactief gijzelaarsdoel; Silhouet; Spinner; Staal; Sticker/splatter; Overig
el: Τύπος στόχου σκοποβολής: Τρισδιάστατο ζώο; Στόχος τύπου σάκου; Πήλινος στόχος; Στόχος Dueling tree; Εκρηκτικός/δυαδικός; Αφρός; Γκονγκ; Στόχος ρύθμισης σκοπευτικού με πλέγμα; IDPA/IPSC; Ανατρεπόμενος; Χαρτί; Χάρτινος στόχος κέντρου (bullseye); Στόχος plate rack; Πολυμερές αυτοϊασης; Στόχος ομήρου; Σιλουέτα; Περιστρεφόμενος; Ατσάλι; Αυτοκόλλητο/splatter; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de alvo de tiro: Animal em 3D; Alvo em formato de saco; Pratos de argila; Árvore de duelo; Explosivo/binário; Espuma; Gongo; Alinhamento de mira (grelha); IDPA/IPSC; De derrubar; Papel; Alvo de papel (centro); Alvos metálicos basculantes; Polímero regenerativo; Alvo reativo com refém; Silhueta; Alvo rotativo; Aço; Autocolante/salpicos; Outro
fr: Type de cible de tir: Animal 3D; Cible en sac; Pigeon d’argile; Arbre de duel; Explosive/binaire; Mousse; Gong; Cible de réglage quadrillée; IDPA/IPSC; Basculante; Papier; Mouche en papier; Support de plaques; Polymère autoréparateur; Otage réactif; Silhouette; Cible rotative; Acier; Autocollant/éclaboussure; Autre
pt-BR: Alvo de tiro, tipo: Animal em 3D; Alvo de saco; Prato de argila; Árvore de duelo; Explosivo/binário; Espuma; Gongo; Alvo com grade para calibragem; IDPA/IPSC; Alvo de queda; Papel; Alvo de papel com mosca; Estante de pratos; Polímero autorregenerativo; Refém reativo; Silhueta; Giratório; Aço; Adesivo/respingo; Outros
de: Art der Zielscheiben: 3D-Tier; Zielsack; Tontaube; Duellbaum; Explodierend/Binär; Schaumstoff; Gong; Einschießscheibe mit Raster; IDPA/IPSC; Klappziel; Papier; Papier-Zielscheibe; Fallplattenanlage; Polymer selbstheilend; Reaktives Geiselziel; Silhouette; Pendelziel; Stahl; Aufkleber/Splatter; Sonstige
zh-TW: 箭靶類型: 3D 動物; 靶袋; 泥鴿; 決鬥樹靶; 爆炸/雙劑靶; 泡棉; 銅鑼靶; 網格歸零靶; IDPA/IPSC; 擊倒靶; 紙靶; 紙製同心圓靶; 鋼板架靶; 聚合物自癒靶; 反應式人質靶; 剪影靶; 旋轉靶; 鋼製靶; 貼紙/飛濺靶; 其他
vi: Loại mục tiêu bắn: Động vật 3D; Mục tiêu dạng túi; Đĩa bắn đất sét; Cây mục tiêu đối kháng; Phát nổ/nhị phân; Mút xốp; Cồng; Bia ngắm căn lưới; IDPA/IPSC; Mục tiêu xô đổ; Giấy; Bia giấy hồng tâm; Giá đỡ đĩa; Polymer tự phục hồi; Mục tiêu con tin phản ứng; Bia hình người; Bia xoay; Thép; Hình dán/bắn tia; Khác
bg-BG: Тип мишена за стрелба: 3D животно; Торба; Глинена паничка; Дуелиращо дърво; Експлозивна/бинарна; Пяна; Гонг; Мрежа за прострелване; IDPA/IPSC; Падаща; Хартия; Хартиена с концентрични кръгове; Стойка с метални плочи; Полимерна самовъзстановяваща се; Реактивна тип заложник; Силует; Въртяща се; Стомана; Стикер/разпръскваща се; Друго
tr: Atış hedefi türü: 3 boyutlu hayvan; Çanta hedefi; Kil güvercin; Düello ağacı; Patlayan/ikili; Köpük; Gong; Izgara sıfırlama; IDPA/IPSC; Devrilen; Kağıt; Kağıt tam isabet; Plaka rafı; Kendi kendini onaran polimer; Tepkimeli rehin; Silüet; Çark; Çelik; Çıkartma/sıçrama; Diğer
en: Shooting target type: 3D animal; Bag target; Clay pigeon; Dueling tree; Exploding/binary; Foam; Gong; Grid sight-in; IDPA/IPSC; Knockover; Paper; Paper bullseye; Plate rack; Polymer self-healing; Reactive hostage; Silhouette; Spinner; Steel; Sticker/splatter; Other
es: Tipo de objetivo de tiro: Animal 3D; Blanco de saco; Plato de arcilla; Árbol de duelo; Explosivo/binario; Espuma; Gong; Calibración con cuadrícula; IDPA/IPSC; Abatible; Papel; Diana de papel; Rack de placas; Polímero autorreparable; Rehén reactivo; Silueta; Giratorio; Acero; Adhesivo/reactivo; Otro
ru: Тип стрелковой мишени: 3D-модель животного; Мишень-мешок; Стендовая тарелочка; Дуэльное дерево; Взрывающаяся/бинарная; Пеноматериал; Гонг; Пристрелочная с сеткой; IDPA/IPSC; Падающая; Бумажная; Бумажная мишень "яблочко"; Стойка с тарелочками (попперами); Полимерная самовосстанавливающаяся; Реактивная "с заложником"; Силуэтная; Вращающаяся; Стальная; Наклейка/сплеш-мишень; Другая
sv: Typ av måltavla: 3D-djur; Säcktavla; Lerduva; Duellträd; Exploderande/binär; Skum; Gong; Rutnätsinskjutning; IDPA/IPSC; Fallmål; Papper; Papperstavla med mittprick; Plate rack; Självläkande polymer; Reaktivt gisslanmål; Silhuett; Snurra; Stål; Klistermärke/splatter; Övrigt
ko: 사격 표적지 유형: 3D 동물; 백 타겟; 클레이 피전; 듀얼링 트리; 폭발/바이너리; 폼; 공; 그리드 영점 조준; IDPA/IPSC; 넉오버; 종이; 종이 과녁; 플레이트 랙; 폴리머 자가 복원; 반응형 인질; 실루엣; 스피너; 강철; 스티커/스플래터; 기타
da: Type af skydemål: 3D-dyr; Skydesæk; Lerdue; Dueling tree; Eksploderende/binært; Skum; Gong; Indskydningsskive med gitter; IDPA/IPSC; Faldmål; Papir; Papirskive; Skivestativ; Selvhelende polymer; Reaktivt gidsel; Silhuet; Spinner; Stål; Klistermærke/splatter; Andet
hu: Lőtábla stílusa: 3D állatcél; Zákkcél; Agyaggalamb; Párbajfa (dueling tree); Robbanó/bináris; Habszivacs; Gong; Belövő rácsos cél; IDPA/IPSC; Ledőlő cél; Papír; Papír céltábla (középponttal); Céllemez-állvány; Polimer (öngyógyuló); Reaktív túszcél; Sziluett; Forgó cél; Acél; Matrica/splatter; Egyéb
cs: Typ střeleckého terče: 3D zvíře; Terčový vak; Asfaltový holub; Soubojový terč (Dueling tree); Výbušný/binární; Pěnový; Gong; Nástřelný s mřížkou; IDPA/IPSC; Sklopný; Papírový; Papírový s kruhy; Sklopné terče (Plate rack); Polymerový (samozacelovací); Reaktivní terč s rukojmím; Silueta; Otočný (spinner); Ocelový; Nalepovací/reaktivní (splatter); Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta mete za gađanje: 3D životinja; Meta u obliku vreće; Glineni golub; Meta 'Dueling tree'; Eksplozivna/binarna; Pjenasta; Gong; Mrežna meta za upucavanje; IDPA/IPSC; Meta za obaranje; Papirnata; Papirnata meta s centrom; Stalak s metama od ploča; Polimerna meta sa samozacjeljivanjem; Reaktivna meta taoca; Silueta; Rotirajuća meta; Čelična; Naljepnica / prskajuća meta; Drugo
zh-CN: 射击靶类型: 3D 动物; 袋靶; 飞碟; 决斗树靶; 爆炸/双组分靶; 泡沫; 锣靶; 网格校准靶; IDPA/IPSC; 击倒靶; 纸靶; 纸质靶心; 排板靶; 聚合物自愈靶; 反应式人质靶; 人形靶; 旋转靶; 钢靶; 贴纸/溅射靶; 其他
sk-SK: Typ streleckého terča: 3D zviera; Vakový terč; Asfaltový holub; Súbojový strom; Výbušný/binárny; Pena; Gong; Nastreľovací terč s mriežkou; IDPA/IPSC; Padací; Papier; Papierový terč; Stojan s platňami; Samoopravný polymér; Reaktívny s rukojemníkom; Silueta; Rotačný; Oceľ; Lepiaci/reaktívny; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta strelske tarče: 3D žival; Tarča (vreča); Glinasti golob; Tarča drevo (dueling tree); Eksplozivna/binarna; Pena; Gong; Tarča za nastrelitev z mrežo; IDPA/IPSC; Prevrkljiva; Papirnata; Papirnata s središčem; Tarča s ploščami (plate rack); Polimerna (samocelilna); Reaktivna (tarča s talcem); Silhueta; Vrtljiva (spinner); Jeklena; Nalepka/tarča, ki označi zadetek; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de țintă pentru trageri: Animal 3D; Țintă tip sac; Taler; Țintă Dueling Tree; Exploziv/binar; Spumă; Gong; Țintă de reglare cu grilă; IDPA/IPSC; Țintă rabatabilă; Hârtie; Țintă cu cercuri din hârtie; Raft cu ținte; Polimer cu auto-refacere; Țintă reactivă ostatic; Siluetă; Rotativă; Oțel; Autocolant/reactivă (splatter); Altele
th: เป้าสำหรับยิง: สัตว์ 3 มิติ; เป้ากระสอบ; เป้าบิน; เป้าแบบ Dueling tree; เป้าระเบิด/ไบนารี; โฟม; ฆ้อง; เป้าตารางตั้งศูนย์; IDPA/IPSC; เป้าล้ม; กระดาษ; เป้าตาวัวกระดาษ; เป้าเพลตเรียง; โพลิเมอร์คืนสภาพ; เป้าจำลองตัวประกันแบบตอบสนอง; เป้าเงาคน; เป้าหมุน; เหล็ก; สติกเกอร์/เป้าระเบิดสี; อื่นๆ
ja: シューティングターゲットタイプ: 3Dアニマル; バッグターゲット; クレーピジョン; デュエリングツリー; 爆発/バイナリ; フォーム; ゴング; グリッドサイトイン; IDPA/IPSC; ノックオーバー; ペーパー; ペーパーブルズアイ; プレートラック; ポリマー自己修復; リアクティブホステージ; シルエット; スピナー; スチール; ステッカー/スプラッター; その他
it: Tipo di bersaglio per tiro: Animale 3D; Bersaglio a sacco; Piattello; Albero da duello; Esplosivo/binario; Schiuma; Gong; Taratura a griglia; IDPA/IPSC; A caduta; Carta; Centro in carta; Rastrelliera per piatti; Polimero autoriparante; Reattivo ostaggio; Sagoma; Girevole; Acciaio; Adesivo/splatter; Altro